Maryland, session 2025, SB0206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
4–401.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Forensic laboratory” means a facility, an entity, or a site that offers or
performs forensic analysis and is owned or operated by the State, a county or municipal
corporation in the State, or another governmental entity.
(3) “Fund” means the Rape Kit COLLECTION, Testing, AND TRACKING
Grant Fund.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0206*

SENATE BILL 206
(4) “Law enforcement agency” means the Department of State Police or a
police department of a county or municipal corporation in the State.
(5) “RN–FNE” MEANS A REGISTERED NURSE – FORENSIC NURSE
EXAMINER CERTIFIED BY THE STATE BOARD OF NURSING.
(b) There is a Rape Kit COLLECTION, Testing, AND TRACKING Grant Fund.
(c) (1) The purpose of the Fund is to provide law enforcement agencies with
MULTIYEAR funding to pay for testing of sexual assault evidence collection kits [by forensic
laboratories].
(2) THE FUND MAY BE USED FOR EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES,
PERSONNEL, AND OUTSOURCING NECESSARY TO TEST SEXUAL ASSAULT EVIDENCE
COLLECTION KITS COLLECTED BEFORE OR AFTER THE ESTABLISHMENT OF THE
FUND.
(d) The Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and
Policy shall:
(1) administer the Fund;
(2) establish and publish procedures for the distribution of funding to [law
enforcement agencies] ELIGIBLE RECIPIENTS OF THE FUND;
(3) ensure each jurisdiction in the State that has a forensic laboratory is
able to access the Fund;
(4) consider the number of sexual assault incidents that were investigated
by a law enforcement agency in the prior fiscal year when distributing funding; and
(5) submit a report with information on the distribution of funding to the
General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, before
[September] OCTOBER 1 each year.
(e) (1) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY
MAY USE UP TO 5% OF THE FUND FOR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSES.
(2) AFTER DISTRIBUTING FUNDING TO PAY FOR TESTING, THE
GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY MAY PROVIDE GRANTS
TO:
(I) LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES TO FUND AN INCREASE IN
THE SEXUAL ASSAULT EVIDENCE COLLECTION KIT TESTING CAPACITY OF

SENATE BILL 206 3
LABORATORIES, INCLUDING TECHNOLOGICAL AND, SUBJECT TO TITLE 3, SUBTITLE
6 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, PHYSICAL
IMPROVEMENTS;
(II) SUPPORT EFFORTS TO ENTER SEXUAL ASSAULT EVIDENCE
COLLECTION KITS INTO THE REPORTING PROGRAM UNDER § 11–926.1 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE;
(III) HOSPITALS FOR THE HIRING OF RN–FNE POSITIONS; AND
(IV) HOSPITALS OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS TO PAY FOR
TRAINING, TRAINING MATERIALS, AND OTHER RESOURCES REQUIRED FOR THE
RN–FNE CERTIFICATION.
(F) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
[(f)] (G) The Fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) any interest earnings of the Fund; and
(3) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
[(g) (1) The Fund may be used only for equipment, supplies, personnel, and
outsourcing necessary for the testing of sexual assault evidence collection kits in forensic
laboratories.
(2) Subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Fund may be used for
equipment, supplies, personnel, and outsourcing necessary for the testing of sexual assault
evidence collection kits collected before or after the establishment of the Fund.]
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund, including interest earnings under
subsection [(f)] (G) of this section, shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the State
budget.

SENATE BILL 206
(j) Money expended from the Fund for testing of sexual assault evidence
collection kits is supplemental to and is not intended to take the place of funding that
otherwise would be appropriated for testing of sexual assault evidence collection kits.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.